District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-3701

Definitions.

Repealed.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-216, § 2, 40 DCR 37
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(b)(1), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 6, 45 DCR 745
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837
1981 Ed., § 2-2631.